Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.020

Definitions.

The following terms, wherever used or referred to in this chapter, shall have the following respective meanings, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

(1) "Authority" or "housing authority" shall mean any of the public corporations created by RCW 35.82.030.

(2) "City" shall mean any city, town, or code city. "County" shall mean any county in the state. "The city" shall mean the particular city for which a particular housing authority is created. "The county" shall mean the particular county for which a particular housing authority is created.

(3) "Governing body" shall mean, in the case of a city, the city council or the commission and in the case of a county, the county legislative authority.

(4) "Mayor" shall mean the mayor of the city or the officer thereof charged with the duties customarily imposed on the mayor or executive head of the city.

(5) "Clerk" shall mean the clerk of the city or the clerk of the county legislative authority, as the case may be, or the officer charged with the duties customarily imposed on such clerk.

(6) "Area of operation": (a) In the case of a housing authority of a city, shall include such city and the area within five miles from the territorial boundaries thereof: PROVIDED, That the area of operation of a housing authority of any city shall not include any area which lies within the territorial boundaries of some other city, as herein defined; (b) in the case of a housing authority of a county, shall include all of the county except that portion which lies within the territorial boundaries of any city as herein defined.

(7) "Federal government" shall include the United States of America, the United States housing authority or any other agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

(8) "Slum" shall mean any area where dwellings predominate which, by reason of dilapidation, overcrowding, lack of ventilation, light or sanitary facilities, or any combination of these factors, are detrimental to safety, health and morals.

(9) "Housing project" shall mean any work or undertaking: (a) To demolish, clear or remove buildings from any slum area; such work or undertaking may embrace the adaptation of such area to public purposes, including parks or other recreational or community purposes; or (b) to provide decent, safe and sanitary urban or rural dwellings, apartments, mobile home parks, or other living accommodations for persons of low income; such work or undertaking may include the rehabilitation of dwellings owned by persons of low income, and also may include buildings, land, equipment, facilities and other real or personal property for necessary, convenient or desirable appurtenances, streets, sewers, water service, parks, site preparation, gardening, administrative, community, health, recreational, welfare or other purposes; or (c) without limitation by implication, to provide decent, safe, and sanitary urban and rural dwellings, apartments, mobile home parks, or other living accommodations for senior citizens; such work or undertaking may include buildings, land, equipment, facilities, and other real or personal property for necessary, convenient, or desirable appurtenances, streets, sewers, water service, parks, site preparation, gardening, administrative, community, health, recreational, welfare, or other purposes; or (d) to accomplish a combination of the foregoing. The term "housing project" also may be applied to the planning of the buildings and improvements, the acquisition of property, the demolition of existing structures, the construction, reconstruction, alteration and repair of the improvements and all other work in connection therewith.

(10) "Persons of low income" shall mean persons or families who lack the amount of income which is necessary (as determined by the authority undertaking the housing project) to enable them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe and sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding.

(11) "Bonds" shall mean any bonds, notes, interim certificates, debentures, or other obligations issued by the authority pursuant to this chapter.

(12) "Real property" shall include all lands, including improvements and fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used in connection therewith, and every estate, interest and right, legal or equitable, therein, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage or otherwise and the indebtedness secured by such liens.

(13) "Obligee of the authority" or "obligee" shall include any bondholder, trustee or trustees for any bondholders, or lessor demising to the authority property used in connection with a housing project, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor's interest or any part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any contract with the authority.

(14) "Mortgage loan" shall mean an interest bearing obligation secured by a mortgage.

(15) "Mortgage" shall mean a mortgage deed, deed of trust or other instrument securing a mortgage loan and constituting a lien on real property held in fee simple, or on a leasehold under a lease having a remaining term at the time the mortgage is acquired of not less than the term for repayment of the mortgage loan secured by the mortgage, improved or to be improved by a housing project.

(16) "Senior citizen" means a person age sixty-two or older who is determined by the authority to be poor or infirm but who is otherwise in some manner able to provide the authority with revenue which (together with all other available moneys, revenues, income, and receipts of the authority, from whatever sources derived) will be sufficient: (a) To pay, as the same become due, the principal and interest on bonds of the authority; (b) to meet the cost of, and to provide for, maintaining and operating projects (including the cost of insurance) and administrative expenses of the authority; and (c) to create (by not less than the six years immediately succeeding the issuance of any bonds) a reserve sufficient to meet the principal and interest payments which will be due on the bonds in any one year thereafter and to maintain such reserve.

(17) "Commercial space" shall mean space which, because of its proximity to public streets, sidewalks, or other thoroughfares, is well-suited for commercial or office use. Commercial space includes but is not limited to office as well as retail space.

[ 1989 c 363 s 1; 1983 c 225 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 187 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 274 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.82.020. Prior: 1939 c 23 s 3; RRS s 6889-3. Formerly RCW 74.24.020.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 225: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1983 c 225 s 4.]

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 187: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 ex.s. c 187 s 4.]